Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 9 Theft and Related Offenses

31-9-1.
Driving without consent of owner or lessee.

Any person who drives a vehicle, not his or her own, without the consent of its owner or lessee, and with intent temporarily to deprive the owner or lessee of his or her possession of the vehicle, without intent to steal the vehicle, is guilty of a felony. The consent of the owner or lessee of a vehicle to its taking or driving shall not in any case be presumed or implied because of the owner’s or lessee’s consent on a prior occasion to the taking or driving of that vehicle by the same or a different person. Any person who assists in, or is a party or accessory to or an accomplice in any unauthorized taking or driving, is guilty of a felony. Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisoned for a term of not more than five (5) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 12, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-9-1

; P.L. 1986, ch. 272, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 356, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 24; P.L. 1989, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 238, § 1.

31-9-2.
Possession of stolen vehicle or parts.

Any person who, with intent to procure or pass title to a vehicle which he or she knows or has reason to believe has been stolen or unlawfully taken, receives or transfers possession of the vehicle from or to another, or who has in his or her possession any vehicle which that person knows or has reason to believe has been stolen or unlawfully taken, and who is not an officer of the law engaged at the time in the performance of his duty as an officer of the law, is guilty of a felony.

Any person who receives, barters, conceals, stores, sells, conveys, or disposes of stolen vehicle parts which that person knows or has reason to believe have been stolen or unlawfully taken is guilty of a felony. Conviction for a second and for subsequent convictions under this section may be punished by imprisonment for a term of not less than one year nor more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 12, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-9-2

; P.L. 1983, ch. 221, § 7.

31-9-3.
Injuring or tampering with vehicles.

Any person who either individually or in association with one or more other persons willfully injures or tampers with any vehicle or breaks or removes any part or parts of or from a vehicle without the consent of the owner is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 12, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-9-3

.

31-9-4.
Manipulating controls with malicious intent.

Any person who with intent to commit any malicious mischief, injury, or other crime climbs into or upon a vehicle whether it is in motion or at rest, or with like intent attempts to manipulate any of the levers, starting mechanism, brakes, or other mechanisms or devices of a vehicle while the vehicle is at rest and unattended, or with like intent sets in motion any vehicle while the vehicle is at rest and unattended is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 12, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-9-4

.

31-9-5.
Alteration of identification number.

No person shall with fraudulent intent remove, deface, destroy, or alter the manufacturer’s serial or engine number or any other distinguishing number or identification mark of a motor vehicle or any of its parts nor shall any person place or stamp any serial, engine, or other number or mark upon a motor vehicle or any part, except one assigned to it by the division of motor vehicles. Any violation of this provision is a felony.

The fact that a person removed, defaced, destroyed, or altered the manufacturer’s serial or engine number or any other distinguishing number or identification mark of a motor vehicle or part, or that a person placed or stamped on a motor vehicle part any serial, engine, or other number or mark different from that originally assigned by the manufacturer to it, without first obtaining a permit from the division of motor vehicles, shall be prima facie evidence of that person’s fraudulent intent.

This section shall not prohibit the restoration by an owner of an original serial, engine, or other number or mark when that restoration is made under a permit issued by the division of motor vehicles, nor prevent any manufacturer from placing in the ordinary course of business numbers or marks upon motor vehicles or their parts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 12, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-9-5

; P.L. 1978, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 221, § 7; P.L. 1984, ch. 264, § 1.

31-9-6.
Possession of any motor vehicle or part thereof with altered identification number.

Any individual, company, or corporation who knowingly buys, receives, disposes of, sells, offers for sale, or has in his or her possession any motor vehicle, or its parts, from which the manufacturer’s serial or engine number or derivative of that number which is ascribed to that vehicle or part by the manufacturer, the owner, or the division of motor vehicles, or from which any other distinguishing number or identification mark or number placed on it under assignment from the division of motor vehicles has been removed, defaced, covered, altered, or destroyed for the purpose of concealing or misrepresenting the identity of that motor vehicle or its parts is guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 12, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-9-6

; P.L. 1978, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 221, § 7.

31-9-7.
Reports by police officers of thefts and recoveries.

Every proper officer, upon receiving reliable information that any vehicle registered under this title has been stolen, shall immediately report the theft to the division of motor vehicles unless prior to this discovery information has been received of the recovery of the vehicle. Any officer, upon receiving information that any vehicle, which was previously reported as stolen, has been recovered, shall immediately report the fact of that recovery to his or her department and the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 12, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-9-7

; P.L. 1979, ch. 254, § 1.

31-9-8.
Notice by owner of theft or embezzlement.

The owner of, or person having a lien or encumbrance upon, a registered vehicle which has been stolen or embezzled may notify the division of motor vehicles of the theft or embezzlement, but in the event of an embezzlement may make a report only after having procured the issuance of a warrant for the arrest of the person charged with the embezzlement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 12, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-9-8

.

31-9-9.
Filing and indexing of theft and embezzlement reports.

The division of motor vehicles, upon receiving a report of a stolen or embezzled vehicle as previously provided for in this chapter, shall file and appropriately index the report.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 12, § 3; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-9-9

.

31-9-10.
Weekly lists of stolen vehicles.

The division of motor vehicles shall at least once each week compile and maintain at its headquarters office a list of all vehicles which have been stolen, embezzled, or recovered as reported to it during the preceding week. Those lists shall be sent to the various police departments in the state and shall be open to inspection by any person interested in any stolen or embezzled vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 12, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-9-10

.

31-9-11.
Sale, purchase, or possession of keys or manipulative devices for automobiles.

Any person who shall sell, offer for sale, purchase, or have in his or her possession keys or manipulative devices designed or adapted to operate the ignition switches, door locks, or trunk locks of two (2) or more motor vehicles, the ignition switches, door locks, and trunk locks of which are designed or intended to be operated with a different key or set of keys for each vehicle, and those vehicles are not owned or leased by that person or in his or her lawful possession and control, unless that person is a locksmith, a duly licensed automobile dealer, a duly licensed body repair shop, an officer or employee of an automobile club or association, or a member of a duly authorized law enforcement agency, shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 95, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 221, § 7.